Washington statutes.
RCW 9.66.010

Public nuisance.

A public nuisance is a crime against the order and economy of the state. Every place

(1) Wherein any fighting between people or animals or birds shall be conducted; or,

(2) Wherein any intoxicating liquors are kept for unlawful use, sale or distribution; or,

(3) Where vagrants resort; and

Every act unlawfully done and every omission to perform a duty, which act or omission

(1) Shall annoy, injure or endanger the safety, health, comfort, or repose of any considerable number of persons; or,

(2) Shall offend public decency; or,

(3) Shall unlawfully interfere with, befoul, obstruct, or tend to obstruct, or render dangerous for passage, a lake, navigable river, bay, stream, canal or basin, or a public park, square, street, alley, highway, or municipal transit vehicle or station; or,

(4) Shall in any way render a considerable number of persons insecure in life or the use of property;

Shall be a public nuisance.

[ 1994 c 45 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 280 s 22; 1909 c 249 s 248; 1895 c 14 s 1; Code 1881 s 1246; RRS s 2500.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—Severability—1994 c 45: See notes following RCW 7.48.140.

Severability—Construction—1971 ex.s. c 280: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected: PROVIDED, That should provisions of this 1971 amendatory act pertaining to the playing of bingo, or holding raffles, permitting the operation of amusement games be held invalid or unconstitutional by the supreme court of the state of Washington as being violative of Article II, section 24, of the Constitution of the state of Washington, then the provisions hereof relating to each such item as aforesaid specifically declared invalid or unconstitutional by such court shall remain inoperative unless and until the qualified electors of this state shall approve an amendment to Article II, section 24, of the Constitution which may remove any constitutional restrictions against the legislature enacting such laws." [ 1971 ex.s. c 280 s 21.]

Boxing and wrestling regulated: Chapter 67.08 RCW.

Devices simulating traffic control signs declared public nuisance: RCW 47.36.180.

Highway obstructions: Chapter 47.32 RCW.

Navigation, obstructing: Chapter 88.28 RCW.

Parimutuel betting on horse races permitted: RCW 67.16.060.